Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.050

Skill centers of excellence—Running start for career and technical education grant program—Career and technical programs of study.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and support skill centers of excellence in key economic sectors of regional significance. The superintendent shall broker the development of skill centers of excellence and identify their roles in developing curriculum and methodologies for reporting skill center course equivalencies for purposes of high school graduation.

(2) Once the skill centers of excellence are established, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and seek funding for a running start for career and technical education grant program to develop and implement career and technical programs of study targeted to regionally determined high-demand occupations. Grant recipients should be partnerships of skill centers of excellence, community college centers of excellence, tech-prep programs, industry advisory committees, area workforce development councils, and skill panels in the related industry. Grant recipients should be expected to develop and assist in the replication of model career and technical education programs of study. The career and technical education programs of study developed should be consistent with the expectations in the applicable federal law.

[ 2007 c 463 s 6.]